New Jersey, session 221, S2039.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  For purposes of this section, vehicle and licensing services shall include, but not be limited to: providing a change of address; and obtaining the issuance or renewal of basic drivers licenses, examination permits, special learners permits, probationary drivers licenses, identification cards, registration certificates, motor vehicle certificates of ownership, including transfers of ownership, and motor vehicle license plates. b.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall provide all vehicle and licensing services at each commission agency location and shall allow these services to be completed in person at each commission agency location. The commission shall permit, but not require, a customer to complete vehicle and licensing services online. c.  At each commission agency location, the commission shall provide service to walk-in customers seeking vehicle and licensing services and shall not require an appointment for such services. The commission shall accommodate all walk-in customers to the extent practicable, including, but not limited to, all times in which a commission agency location experiences a no show appointment or is not booked to full capacity. d.  The commission shall ensure that one or more camera and license printers are available at each commission agency location for emergency services including, but not limited to, the provision of a reprinted 30-day temporary license in the event that an initial temporary license has expired before a permanent license was received in the mail. e.  The commission shall permanently adopt a scheduling system that allows an applicant for, or holder of, a commercial drivers license to schedule an appointment via the Internet for written tests, skills tests, and endorsement tests and subsequently take the test at a commission facility. The tests shall be available at each commission agency location or facility and the scheduling shall be available to all commercial motor vehicle drivers, in addition to any titling or other motor vehicle services that are required to be completed in person. f.  The New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall require the addition of regional service center services at any commission agency location with the space and staff available to accommodate such additional services. g.  The New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall create and make available, both electronically on its Internet website and in paper form at each commission agency location, an informational pamphlet that lists all commission services and provides instructions for customers on how to apply for and receive those services. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month after enactment, but the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission may take anticipatory actions necessary to implement the provisions of this act.